Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2225
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-2225 to 71-2230:

(1) CSF program shall mean the Commodity Supplemental Food Program administered by the United States Department of Agriculture or its successor;

(2) Food instrument shall mean a voucher, check, coupon, or other document used to obtain supplemental foods;

(3) Supplemental foods shall mean (a) foods containing nutrients determined to be beneficial for infants, children, and pregnant, breast-feeding, or postpartum women as prescribed by the United States Department of Agriculture for use in the WIC program and (b) foods donated by the United States Department of Agriculture for use in the CSF program; and

(4) WIC program shall mean the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children as administered by the United States Department of Agriculture or its successor.

Laws 1987, LB 643, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 21;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 102.